North Dakota statutes. TITLE 24 Highways, Bridges, And Ferries
CHAPTER 24-02 Director of the Department of Transportation

24-02-01.
State highway department established — Commissioner is head of department. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 72, § 25.

24-02-01.1.
Department of transportation — Creation — Transfer of functions.

The department of transportation is established as an executive department of this state. Transferred to and vested in the department of transportation are the functions, powers, and duties of the following governmental agencies:

The highway department, the highway commissioner, and the chief engineer, including titles 24 and 39, chapter 49-17.1, and sections 49-10.1-17, 49-17.2-27, and 55-01-01.

The motor vehicle department and the registrar of motor vehicles, including title 39, chapter 57-40.3, and sections 26.1-23-03 and 26.1-41-02.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 72, § 3; 1997, ch. 471, § 1.

Cross-References.

Validation of acts of board of county commissioners and highway commission, see § 1-06-02.

24-02-01.2.
Department of transportation and director of the department of transportation to be substituted for motor vehicle department, registrar of motor vehicles, highway department, and highway commissioner.

Wherever the terms “motor vehicle department”, “registrar of motor vehicles”, “highway department”, or “highway commissioner”, or any derivative of those terms which, when used in context indicates an intention to refer to those persons or departments, shall appear in the North Dakota Century Code, the term “department of transportation”, or the term “director of the department of transportation”, as the case may be, shall be substituted therefor. It is the intent of the legislative assembly that the department of transportation and the director of the department of transportation must be substituted for, shall take any actions previously taken by, and shall perform all duties previously performed by the motor vehicle department, the registrar of motor vehicles, the highway department, and the highway commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 72, § 2.

Cross-References.

Commissioner may allow public utilities to use right of way, see § 24-01-40.

Commissioner to approve designation and allocation of mileage on county road systems, see § 24-05-16.

Junkyards adjacent to highways, see N.D.C.C. ch. 24-16.

Manuals, preparation, see § 24-03-18.

Motor vehicle operators’ licenses, duties and powers regarding, see N.D.C.C. ch. 39-06.

One-way roadways, designation, see § 39-10-16.

Records of process received for nonresident motorists, see § 39-01-13.

Slow-moving vehicle emblem, design and positioning of, see § 39-21-50.

Traffic control devices, see §§ 39-13-06 to 39-13-08.

Vehicle weight restrictions, see § 39-12-03.

24-02-01.3.
Director of the department of transportation — Appointment — Compensation.

The department of transportation must be managed and directed by the director of the department of transportation, who must be appointed by, and serve at the pleasure of, the governor. The director shall take the oath of office required of civil officers by section 44-01-05. The director shall receive compensation in the amount established by the governor within the limits of legislative appropriations.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 72, § 4; 1993, ch. 45, § 9.

Cross-References.

Oath of civil officers, see § 44-01-05.

Travel expenses, see §§ 44-08-03 to 44-08-04.2, 54-06-09.

24-02-01.4.
Structure of the department of transportation.

The department of transportation must be structured to promote efficient and effective operations consistent with fulfilling its statutory duties. The department of transportation must be organized into offices, divisions, and districts as the director of the department of transportation determines necessary, and as provided in this section.

The director shall establish an office of driver and vehicle services to administer the department’s regulatory authority over motor vehicle titling and registration, operator licensing and traffic safety, and motor carriers. Operating expenses for functions performed by the department under chapters 39-04 and 39-05 must be funded by appropriations from collections made under those chapters before deposit into the fund provided by section 54-27-19.

The director shall establish an office of state highways and engineering to administer the department’s authority and responsibilities over the construction, maintenance, and repair of highways in this state, including the operation of district offices.

The director may establish an office of transportation planning to administer the department’s authority and responsibilities for planning all surface modes of transportation, budgeting, development of programs and projects, data collection and management, and research. Coordination must be established between the aeronautics commission planning section and the department of transportation office of planning for airport development as it pertains to surface access.

The director shall establish an office of management services in the department to provide for the employment of human resources, finance and inventory control, automation, and other administrative services.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 72, § 5; 1991, ch. 289, § 1.

24-02-01.5.
Department of transportation — Administrative rules.

The department of transportation may adopt the administrative rules necessary to carry out its responsibilities and functions as created and transferred by sections 24-02-01.1 through 24-02-01.5. Rules adopted by the agencies whose functions relate to the functions or agencies created, transferred, or covered by sections 2-05-03, 24-02-01.1 through 24-02-01.5, subsections 7 and 11 of section 24-01-01.1, sections 24-02-13, 24-16-02, 24-17-02, subsections 11, 16, and 17 of section 39-01-01, subsection 1 of section 39-16-01, subsection 2 of section 49-17.1-01, subsection 1 of section 54-06-04, subsection 1 of section 54-27-19, subsection 6 of section 57-40.3-01, subsection 1 of section 57-43.1-01, section 57-43.1-44, subsection 6 of section 57-43.2-01, and section 57-43.2-37 remain in effect until they are specifically amended or repealed by the department.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 72, § 6; 1993, ch. 272, § 1; 1995, ch. 350, § 17; 1999, ch. 245, § 1; 2001, ch. 548, § 1; 2003, ch. 531, § 1; 2005, ch. 341, § 1; 2005, ch. 340, § 1; 2005, ch. 94, § 6.

24-02-02.
State highway commissioner — Appointment, term, removal, oath, bond, salary. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 72, § 25.

24-02-02.1.
Agreement for the construction of the Oahe bridge.

The director is authorized to execute an agreement with the federal government for the construction of a bridge over the Oahe Reservoir wherein the department agrees to hold the United States harmless and free from damages due to the construction or operation and maintenance of such bridge, except for damages due to the fault or negligence of the United States or its contractors.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 273, § 1.

24-02-02.2.
Authority to contract with adjoining states and provinces.

The director may contract with adjoining states and provinces to provide for the construction, reconstruction, repair, or maintenance of highways located on or near the border of each jurisdiction.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 274, § 1.

24-02-02.3.
Director may enter agreements with tribal governments.

Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 54-40.2, the director may enter agreements with any one or more tribal governments for the purpose of construction and maintenance of highways, streets, roads, and bridges on the state highway system or for federally funded safety improvement projects on tribal-owned highways, streets, roads, and bridges.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 259, § 1; 2009, ch. 233, § 1; 2017, ch. 200, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 216, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

24-02-02.4.
Agreement for the construction of the Fargo Moorhead metropolitan area flood risk management project impacting the state highway system.

The director may enter an agreement with the metro flood diversion authority regarding the portion of the construction of the Fargo Moorhead metropolitan area flood risk management project which will impact the state highway system. The agreement must address the construction and maintenance of the parts of the project which need to be constructed and maintained on the state highway system.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 201, § 1, effective March 9, 2017.

24-02-02.5.
Rest area cooperative agreement.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director may enter a cooperative agreement with the Theodore Roosevelt national park painted canyon visitor center for the joint administration and operation of a rest area facility for use by the traveling public. The director may expend moneys from the state highway fund within the limits of legislative appropriations for administration and operational support of the rest area facility.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 40, § 9, effective July 1, 2021.

24-02-03.
Responsibilities of commissioner. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 72, § 25.

24-02-03.1.
Cooperation of director in matters of national defense.

In order to facilitate national defense, the director is hereby authorized to cooperate with the appropriate federal agency, when requested by it, in:

Making of surveys, plans, specifications, and estimates for, and in the construction and maintenance of, flight strips and of roads and bridges necessary to provide access to military and naval reservations, defense industries, defense-industry sites, and sources of raw materials.

Acquiring of land necessary for the construction of such flight strips and roads and bridges by purchase or condemnation in the manner provided by law for the purchase or condemnation of land required for state highway construction.

Replacing existing highways and highway connections shut off from general public use at military and naval reservations and defense-industry sites.

Entering into contracts in any manner approved by the appropriate federal agency for the construction of any such flight strips or roads.

Performing such construction and maintenance work by force account, whether paid for in whole by federal funds or in part by federal funds and in part by funds provided by the state or any of its subdivisions.

Provided, that no cooperative venture may be entered into when any funds appropriated by the legislative assembly for highway purposes are to be expended thereby, unless such expended funds are to be reimbursed from federal sources.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 266, § 1.

24-02-03.2.
Director may protect roads from damage and negotiate settlement for damages.

Whenever federally financed construction or maintenance activities are likely to affect any public road within this state, the director is hereby authorized to take such action as may be necessary to protect such public road from any damages that may be caused, and to negotiate with any contractor or any officer or agency of the federal government for the repair of damage or extraordinary maintenance that may be required on such public road. If the public road affected is under the jurisdiction of any county, city, or township, the director shall obtain the concurrence of the appropriate governing board of such county, city, or township before any agreement is entered into or any other action is taken with respect to such public road.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 266, § 2.

24-02-03.3.
Central management system for all state-owned licensed motor vehicles.

The director shall establish within the department a central vehicle management system to regulate the operation, maintenance, and management of all motor vehicles owned or leased by the state subject to registration under chapters 39-04 and 39-05. Upon the request of a state agency and an agreement between the agency and director for the use of the motor vehicle-related equipment, the director may purchase or lease motor vehicle-related equipment and include that equipment within the system. The director shall provide a uniform method of documenting the use and cost of operation of motor vehicles and motor vehicle-related equipment in the system. The director shall advise the director of the office of management and budget as to the need to acquire or dispose of system motor vehicles. The specifications for highway patrol vehicles to be acquired may be set by the highway patrol superintendent. Every state agency, institution, department, board, bureau, and commission unless exempted by the director must use the system. At the request of the director of the North Dakota agricultural experiment station, certain vehicles used in farming operations at the agronomy seed farm and branch research centers shall be exempt from the requirements of this section. However, an agency, institution, department, board, bureau, or commission may authorize the use of an employee’s personal motor vehicle pursuant to subsection 4 of section 54-06-09.

The director may enter into an agreement with a state employee who has a disability requiring a specially-equipped vehicle to pay a mileage rate greater than the rate established in section 54-06-09 for the employee’s use of the employee’s specially-equipped motor vehicle while conducting state business. The rate must be based on the rate provided in section 54-06-09, increased by the actual cost per mile caused by the special equipment, and may not exceed the cost associated with the special equipment expressed as the new value plus the depreciated fair market value in eight years divided by two, divided by twenty thousand miles.

Each entity required to use the system shall submit records of the operation of each vehicle as directed by the director.

The director may enter an agreement for the use of the motor vehicle-related equipment with the North Dakota art museum established in section 54-02-11.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 303, § 1; 1987, ch. 314, § 1; 1995, ch. 260, § 1; 1999, ch. 246, § 1; 2001, ch. 252, § 1; 2001, ch. 473, § 1; 2007, ch. 20, § 8; 2015, ch. 47, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

24-02-03.4.
Transfer of motor vehicles.

The title or other documents representing ownership of a motor vehicle owned or leased by the board of higher education and the institutions under its jurisdiction must be transferred to the director on August 1, 1995.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 314, § 2; 1989, ch. 330, § 1; 1995, ch. 260, § 2.

24-02-03.5.
User charges — Incidental revenues.

Each entity using the central vehicle management system shall pay a user charge to the director. The user charge will be set by the director and must be based upon the actual cost of the service provided, including depreciation. The user charges and any proceeds from insurance claims, motor vehicle sales, commercial refunds or rebates, or similarly derived proceeds must be remitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the fleet services fund.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 314, § 3; 2007, ch. 316, § 1.

24-02-03.6.
Board of higher education fleet committee. [Expired]

Expired under S.L. 1995, ch. 260, § 4.

24-02-04.
Commissioner to devote full time to office. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 72, § 25.

24-02-05.
Office hours, sessions, and hearings of commissioner. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 72, § 25.

24-02-06.
Chief engineer — Qualifications, salary. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 72, § 25.

24-02-07.
Expenses of department employees.

In addition to the compensation received for their service, employees of the department are entitled to receive their expenses actually and necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties, the amount of the expenses so allowed to be fixed and determined by the director.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 11; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0207.

Cross-References.

Travel expenses, see §§ 44-08-03 to 44-08-04.2, 54-06-09.

24-02-07.1.
Engineering scholarships established. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 206, § 2.

24-02-07.2.
Contract of employment or repayment a prerequisite. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 206, § 2.

24-02-07.3.
Prequalification, selection, and contracting for consultants — Solicitations.

The director may prequalify, select, and contract for consultants in the area of engineering, land surveying, architecture, traffic safety, business administration, and related matters. The prequalification of the consultant must be based on detailed information regarding firm organization, qualifications of personnel, type of work the firm is qualified to perform, previous work experience, and financial status and must be provided to the director in a form approved by the director. If a consultant meets the criteria set by the director, the director shall prequalify the consultant, noting any limitations as to the type or amount of the work the consultant may perform. When a consultant is prequalified, the consultant is entitled to receive requests for proposals, proposals, and other solicitations for work in the areas in which the consultant is prequalified without any other screening or qualification process. The period of prequalification may not exceed three years. The qualifications of the consultant for a specific project must be determined according to the criteria in subsection 5 of section 54-44.7-03. The director shall publish a prequalification solicitation at least once each year and need not comply with the provision in subdivision c of subsection 2 of section 54-44.7-03 requiring the publication of an invitation for a specific project. The selection and contract negotiation must be performed according to subsections 6 and 7 of section 54-44.7-03.

The director is not required to comply with subsection 3 of section 54-44.7-03 or 54-44.7-04 and may procure the services of consultants for:

Projects with consultant costs estimated to be not more than one hundred thousand dollars through direct negotiation with a selected prequalified firm, after considering the nature of the project; the proximity of the architect, engineer, construction management, or land surveying services to the project; the capability of the architect, engineer, construction manager, or land surveyor to produce the required services within a reasonable time; past performance; and the ability to meet project budget requirements. Fees paid pursuant to this subdivision during the twelve months immediately preceding negotiation of the contract by the department of transportation for professional services performed by any one architectural, engineering, or land surveying individual or firm may not exceed two hundred thousand dollars. A person seeking to render professional services under this section shall furnish the department a list of professional services previously provided to the department, including the fees paid during the twelve months immediately preceding the contract being negotiated. If the department determines that it is appropriate, the department may use the procurement procedures in subdivision b or c in place of the procedures in this subdivision.

Projects with consultant costs estimated to be greater than one hundred thousand dollars but not more than three hundred thousand dollars by notifying all prequalified firms in the specific area of need, allowing a minimum of seven calendar days to respond, and following the remaining process in subsections 4 through 7 of section 54-44.7-03. If the department determines that it is appropriate, the department may use the procurement procedures in subdivision c in place of the procedures in this subdivision.

Projects with consultant costs estimated to be greater than three hundred thousand dollars by notifying all prequalified firms, allowing a minimum of twenty-one calendar days to respond, and following the remaining process in subsections 4 through 7 of section 54-44.7-03.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when soliciting the services of consultants under this section, the director may include multiple projects in one solicitation. The requirements for the project within the highest dollar threshold under subsection 2 apply to all of the projects in the multiple project solicitation.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 275, § 1; 2005, ch. 247, § 1; 2011, ch. 198, § 1.

24-02-08.
Engineering consulting services — Coordinator of highway, road, and street program within state.

The director may provide consulting engineering services upon request of any governmental unit.

The director has the authority and responsibility for the coordination of the total highway, road, and street program within this state, including the designation of systems, which the director may functionally classify as to the types of service, and the development of construction standards as hereinafter provided for.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, §§ 12, 13; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0208; S.L. 1975, ch. 236, § 5; 1999, ch. 245, § 2.

24-02-09.
Departmental budget estimates — Departmental budgets.

Not later than the fifteenth day of May of each year, each head of a department, division, section, or activity of the department who may be directed and designated to do so by the director shall submit to the director an outline of the work which should be undertaken by such department, division, section, or activity during the following fiscal year and the estimated expense thereof, in such detail as the director may prescribe, together with such other cost data and information as the director shall direct.

Not later than the thirtieth day of June of each year, the director shall adopt a departmental budget wherein must be allocated, set aside, and appropriated to each department, division, section, or activity of the department for the ensuing fiscal year a definite and fixed sum or allowance in such amount and with such detail as the director may elect for the use and purpose specified in such departmental budget. Nothing herein, however, prevents the director from adding to, amending, revising, or reducing from time to time, and as circumstances may warrant, such departmental budget.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, §§ 14, 15; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0209; S.L. 1959, ch. 230, § 1.

24-02-10.
Biennial report.

The director shall submit a biennial report to the governor and the secretary of state in accordance with section 54-06-04.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 16; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0210; S.L. 1963, ch. 346, § 24; 1973, ch. 403, § 17; 1975, ch. 466, § 18; 1995, ch. 350, § 18.

24-02-11.
Records of department open to public — Certain records not open to public — Certified copies.

The director is custodian of, and shall preserve, the files and records of the department. The files and records of the department must be open to public inspection under reasonable regulations. However, records relating to the financial condition of any party are not open to public inspection if that party:

Has applied for prequalification as a bidder;

Is designated as a prequalified bidder pursuant to this chapter;

Is an applicant under the disadvantaged business enterprise program;

Makes a submission in furtherance of being selected as a consultant;

Is selected as a consultant; or

Is subject to audit by the department.

Copies of files and records of the department, when certified by the director as being true copies, must be received in evidence in any court in the state with the same force and effect as the originals.

The books of account of the department must be kept accurately and completely as must be prescribed or approved by the state auditor, which must show among other things the following facts:

The cost of maintaining the department, including the salaries and expenses of the individual members thereof.

The amounts of money expended for the construction or maintenance of the state highways, when and where, and upon what job or portion of the road expended, so that the cost per mile [1.61 kilometers] of the construction or maintenance can be ascertained with ease.

The amount of road equipment and materials purchased and when and where and from whom purchased. The book also must show the price paid for each item. The original invoice or a photographic copy thereof must form a part of the permanent files and records in the department.

The director shall charge a uniform fee, by type of record.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 17; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0211; S.L. 1967, ch. 207, § 1; 1979, ch. 187, § 39; 1985, ch. 300, § 1; 1993, ch. 274, § 2; 1997, ch. 237, § 1.

Cross-References.

Access to public records, see § 44-04-18.

Evidence of public records, see N.D.R.Ev. 1005.

24-02-12.
Auditing and payment of payrolls.

Payroll vouchers prepared on forms adopted in accordance with section 24-02-34 must be certified and approved by the director and the same must be presented to the office of management and budget which shall prepare and issue a warrant signed by the state auditor for each person named thereon without submitting such payroll voucher to the office of the budget for its examination and approval.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 18; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0212; S.L. 1959, ch. 372, § 31.

24-02-13.
Payment of estimates on contract or deposits in condemnation.

Whenever any estimate or allowance for payment, except a final estimate or payment subsequent to a final estimate, is allowed, or granted, on a contract entered into by the department, or a deposit is to be made with the clerk of district court in a condemnation proceeding, and the estimate is vouchered by the department for presentation to the office of management and budget, instead of submitting the estimate to the contractor or clerk of district court for certification, the director of the department or the director’s authorized designee shall make the following certificate, in lieu of the certificate otherwise required by law, which must be printed on the voucher or claim:

Estimate certificate. I hereby certify that the within estimate or claim is just and true, that the contractor herein named has rendered the services and furnished the material herein charged, that they are of the value claimed, that no part thereof has been paid, and that the foregoing estimate or claim is supported by a proper contract and bond on file in the department or that the purpose of the payment to a clerk of district court is pursuant to law and for the taking of property by condemnation.
Director, Department of Transportation

Click to view

After a certified estimate or deposit with a clerk of district court has been approved for payment by the director, the same must be presented to the office of management and budget for payment. The office of management and budget thereupon shall prepare and issue a warrant therefor signed by the state auditor without submitting the voucher or claim to the office of the budget for examination and allowance. The foregoing procedure does not apply to the final estimate or allowance to a contractor, nor to any estimate or allowance subsequent or supplemental to the final estimate, but the final estimate or supplemental allowance must conform to the provisions of law relative to the certification and approval of any other claim or demand; nor does the procedure apply to payments to property owners involved in the taking of property in any condemnation proceeding.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 19; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0213; S.L. 1959, ch. 372, § 32; 1963, ch. 214, § 1; 1985, ch. 301, § 1; 1989, ch. 72, § 9.

24-02-14.
Acts prohibited. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

24-02-15.
Action against employee of department on bond.

The state, and civil government divisions thereof, and any person damaged by any wrongful act or omission of any bonded employee of the department in the performance of the employee’s official duties may maintain an action on the employee’s bond for the recovery of damages so sustained.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 21; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0215.

24-02-16.
Basis of contracts for construction work.

The director may request bids and award contracts for construction work requiring the contractor to furnish all equipment, labor, materials, and supplies for each particular contract or project, or requiring the director to furnish and provide the contractor with materials and supplies as the director may elect. If the director elects to provide materials and supplies for any project or construction work, the director shall notify the office of management and budget of the fact that the director has elected to furnish the materials and supplies. The office of management and budget may either exempt the purchase and allow the director to request and let bids and make the purchase, or the office of management and budget may handle the bidding and purchasing through its central purchasing agency. Either the office of management and budget or the director shall request proposals or bids for the total and aggregate of the materials and supplies for any and all projects or construction work according to the class, type, and nature of the materials and supplies and may award a contract or contracts therefor upon a basis deemed efficient and economical, whether upon the basis of delivery to the construction project directly or to a central storehouse or storehouses maintained by the state. The materials and supplies purchased by the office of management and budget or the department of transportation may be delivered to the project or construction work without expense to the contractor doing the construction work or may be sold to the contractor at cost and made to constitute a part of the construction cost, as the director may elect.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 68; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0216; S.L. 1959, ch. 372, § 33; 1999, ch. 245, § 3.

Cross-References.

Contractors, see N.D.C.C. ch. 43-07.

Department of accounts and purchases, see N.D.C.C. ch. 54-44.

24-02-17.
Contracts — Bids.

Whenever the cost of any construction improvement exceeds the sum of twenty thousand dollars, the department shall proceed to advertise the same, request bids, and award such contracts in the manner provided in this chapter. The department may accept bids and bid bonds that are submitted by electronic media such as the internet. The director may adopt the procedures and rules necessary to implement this section.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 69; 1953, ch. 178, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0217; S.L. 1959, ch. 231, § 1; 1959, ch. 372, § 34; 1961, ch. 203, § 1; 1981, ch. 291, § 2; 1985, ch. 302, § 1; 1993, ch. 274, § 3; 2003, ch. 221, § 1.

Cross-References.

Purchase of equipment and materials from federal government without advertising for bids, see § 24-03-13.

Collateral References.

Determination of amount involved in contract within statutory provision requiring public contracts involving sums exceeding specified amount to be let to lowest bidder, 53 A.L.R.2d 498.

Personal services: contract for personal services as within requirement of submission of bids as condition of public contract, 15 A.L.R.3d 733.

Right of bidder for state or municipal contract to rescind bid on ground that bid was based upon his own mistake or that of his employee, 2 A.L.R.4th 991.

24-02-18.
Reconstruction work without letting contract.

The department may, if in the opinion of the director, the public interest and the preservation of the state highways from deterioration requires it, do the work necessary for minor grading reconstruction on any state highway without letting a contract for such reconstruction work, or the director may contract with the county in which any such reconstruction project is located, to perform such reconstruction work on a cost basis. Any such reconstruction projects may include any project that is eligible for federal aid. Any funds available for highway reconstruction purposes may be expended in carrying out the provisions of this section.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 70; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0218; S.L. 1985, ch. 302, § 2.

Cross-References.

Force accounts in emergencies, see § 24-03-04.

24-02-19.
Request for bids — How solicited.

Any request for bids for construction work or the improvement of any state highway, or any structure in excess of the amount specified in section 24-02-17, must be advertised by publication once prior to the opening of such bids, in the official newspaper of the county in which the project is located. Any other advertisement made by the director may utilize one or more of the following methods:

The publication of the solicitation in a daily newspaper having a general circulation in the area where the project is located.

The publication of the solicitation in commonly recognized trade journals or similar publications that advertise the solicitation of bids on public work projects.

The written solicitation of all qualified contractors appearing on the bidders’ list as maintained by the department of transportation.

When the solicitation is by publication, it must be made at least three weeks prior to the date of the bid opening. The solicitation must state where the bidder may inspect the plans and specifications, with whom bids must be filed, and the time and place where bids must be opened. Such place must be the office of the department.

All requests for bids for the purchase of equipment, materials, and supplies, exclusive of repairs to equipment and except as provided in section 25-16.2-02 in excess of the sum of twenty thousand dollars must be advertised in the official newspaper of the county in which the department district is located. The advertisement must be published once a week for a period of two successive weeks prior to the opening of such bids.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 71; 1953, ch. 178, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0219; S.L. 1961, ch. 203, § 2; 1985, ch. 302, § 3; 1987, ch. 329, § 4; 1991, ch. 288, § 2; 1993, ch. 274, § 4.

24-02-20.
Bids, where opened — Requirements — Bonds or checks of three lowest bidders retained.

All bids must be opened at the time and place specified in the advertised request for bids. Each bid must be accompanied by a certified or cashier’s check of the bidder on a solvent bank, in an amount equal to five percent of the bidder’s bid, to be forfeited to the state highway fund should the bidder fail to effect a contract within ten days after notice of an award or by a bidder’s bond in a sum equal to ten percent of the full amount of the bid, executed by the bidder as principal and by a surety company authorized to do business in this state, conditioned that if the principal’s bid be accepted and the contract awarded to the principal, the principal, within ten days after notice of award, will execute and effect a contract in accordance with the terms of the principal’s bid and a contractor’s bond as required by law and the regulations and determinations of the department.

All bonds or checks, except those of the responsible bidders submitting the three lowest and best bids, must be returned to the bidders promptly upon opening such bids. The bond or check of the responsible bidder submitting the lowest and best bid may be cashed or retained until the contract has been awarded and executed properly. The bonds or checks of the responsible bidders submitting the second and third lowest and best bids may be returned to the bidders when the department has determined to whom the contract is to be awarded.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, §§ 72, 73; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0220; S.L. 1959, ch. 232, § 1; 1961, ch. 124, § 2; 1963, ch. 215, § 1; 1967, ch. 208, § 1.

Cross-References.

Provision relating to compensation required in contractor’s bonds, see § 65-04-10.

Collateral References.

Differences in character or quality of materials, articles, or work as affecting acceptance of bid for public contract, 27 A.L.R.2d 917.

Public contracts authority of state or its subdivision to reject all bids, 52 A.L.R.4th 186.

24-02-21.
Contracts on informal bids — How let.

Informal bids must be requested and the contract therefor may be awarded upon such basis and procedure as the director directs.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 74; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0221.

24-02-22.
Separate proposals on each type of work.

Whenever any highway improvement involves structural work, dirt grading and traffic service gravel, graveling, stabilizing and oiling, or concrete surfacing, or any two or more of them, then wherever practicable and not contrary to any federal law or regulations, separate proposals and bids must be received on each separate type of work.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 75; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0222.

24-02-23.
Award of contracts — Bonds.

Each and every contract in excess of the sum specified in section 24-02-17 must be awarded by the department to the responsible bidder submitting the lowest and best bid, but said department may reject all bids. If no satisfactory bid or bids are received, new bids may be called for. The successful bidder must be required to furnish a suitable bond in at least the amount of the contract and with such surety as may be determined by the department and as approved by it.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 76; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0223; S.L. 1959, ch. 231, § 2; 1985, ch. 302, § 4.

24-02-24.
Participating county or municipality to be notified of opening of bids.

In the event that any county or municipality participates in and defrays the cost, or part of the cost, of any improvement to be made by the department, the director shall notify the board of county commissioners of the county so interested, or the proper city officials of any municipality, of the time set for opening bids.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 77; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0224.

24-02-25.
Payments made monthly to contractors.

Payment must be made monthly to the contractor for all work done or material furnished, in such amount as must be determined by the director, but in no event less than ninety percent nor more than ninety-nine percent thereof, and payment must be made in full upon the completion of the contract and acceptance of the work.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 78; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0225; S.L. 1959, ch. 233, § 1.

24-02-25.1.
Claims against project — Notice of claim — When filed — Where filed.

Any person who has furnished labor, materials, or supplies on a contract awarded under section 24-02-23, and who has not been paid in full at the time of final acceptance of the project by the department, has the right to file a claim against the contractor and the surety furnishing the performance bond.

Notice of the claim must be given, in writing, to the contractor or the surety furnishing the performance bond and must provide a clear and concise statement of the labor, materials, and supplies furnished, to whom it was furnished, and the monetary value thereof. The claim must bear interest, on each transaction for labor, materials, or supplies, commencing thirty days after the last transaction. The rate of interest must be the rate provided in section 28-20-34. The notice of the claim must be made by certified mail postage prepaid, in an envelope addressed to the contractor at any place the contractor maintains an office or has a residence and posted within one hundred eighty days from the date on which the person completed the contribution giving rise to the claim.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 304, § 1; 1985, ch. 303, § 1; 1987, ch. 316, § 1.

Collateral References.

Highway meridian barriers, governmental tort liability as to, 58 A.L.R.4th 559.